Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.615

Landlord mitigation program account.

(1) The landlord mitigation program account is created in the custody of the state treasury. All transfers and appropriations by the legislature, repayments, private contributions, and all other sources must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may only be used for the landlord mitigation program under this chapter to reimburse landlords for eligible claims related to private market rental units during the time of their rental to low-income tenants using housing subsidy programs as defined in RCW 43.31.605, for any unpaid judgment issued within an unlawful detainer action after a court order pursuant to RCW 59.18.410(3) as described in RCW 43.31.605(1)(b), for any unpaid rent as described in RCW 43.31.605(1)(c), for any damages to rental property as described in RCW 43.31.605(1)(d), and for the administrative costs identified in subsection (2) of this section. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) Administrative costs associated with application, distribution, and other program activities of the department may not exceed twenty percent of the annual funds available for the landlord mitigation program. Reappropriations must not be included in the calculation of the annual funds available for determining the administrative costs.

(3) Funds deposited into the landlord mitigation program account shall be prioritized by the department for allowable costs under RCW 43.31.605(1) (a) and (d), and may only be used for other allowable costs when funding available in the account exceeds the amount needed to pay claims under RCW 43.31.605(1) (a) and (d).

[ 2022 c 196 s 6; 2021 c 115 s 6; 2019 c 356 s 13; 2018 c 66 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2022 c 196: See note following RCW 43.31.605.

Finding—Intent—Application—Effective date—2021 c 115: See notes following RCW 59.18.620.

Intent—2019 c 356: See note following RCW 59.12.030.